Tennessee statutes. Title 25 Judgments
Chapter 5

Lien of Judgment

25-5-101. Real property.

Judgments and decrees obtained before July 1, 1967, in any court of record of this state, in the county where the debtor resides at the time of rendition, shall be liens upon the debtor's land in that county from the time the same were rendered.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2), judgments and decrees obtained from and after July 1, 1967, in any court of record and judgments in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) obtained from and after July 1, 1969, in any court of general sessions of this state shall be liens upon the debtor's land from the time a certified copy of the judgment or decree shall be registered in the lien book in the register's office of the county where the land is located. If such records are kept elsewhere, no lien shall take effect from the rendition of such judgments or decrees unless and until a certified copy of the same is registered as otherwise provided by law.

Judgments and decrees obtained by a governmental entity from and after July 1, 2005, in any court in counties having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be liens upon the debtor's land from the time a certified copy of the judgment or decree is registered in the lien book in the register's office of the county where the land is located. If such records are kept elsewhere, no lien shall take effect from the rendition of such judgments or decrees, unless and until a certified copy of the lien is registered as otherwise provided by law.

Attachments, orders, injunctions and other writs affecting title, use or possession of real estate, issued by any court, shall be effective against any person having, or later acquiring, an interest in such property who is not a party to the action wherein such attachment, order, injunction or other writ is issued only after an appropriate copy or abstract, or a notice of lis pendens, is recorded in the register's office of the county wherein the property is situated. If an abstract is used, the contents shall be as prescribed in § 25-5-108.

Code 1858, § 2980 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, § 7; 1833, ch. 92, § 6); Shan., § 4708; Code 1932, § 8043; Acts 1957, ch. 310, § 1; 1967, ch. 375, § 1; 1969, ch. 33, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-501; Acts 1983, ch. 212, § 1; 2005, ch. 306, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Priority of mechanics' and materialmen's lien, §66-11-109.

Rights of third parties, §25-5-107.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 89, 98, 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 14; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 27, 30-33; 19 Tenn. Juris., Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, § 20; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 193.

The Many Lives of a Tennessee Judgment Lien (Stephen M. Sumner), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

The New Bankruptcy Code, Part II: The Interests of Secured Creditors Under the New Bankruptcy Code (Howard B. Pickard), 10 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 215.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

25-5-102. Equitable interests.

A judgment or decree shall not bind the equitable interest of the debtor in real estate or other property until a memorandum or abstract of the judgment or decree, stating the amount and date thereof, with the names of the parties is certified by the clerk and registered in the register's office of the county where the real estate is situated.

Code 1858, § 2984 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 11, § 3; 1832, ch. 92, § 6); Shan., § 4712; mod. Code 1932, § 8047; Acts 1967, ch. 375, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-503.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 459.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 30, 32, 37, 74.

Law Reviews.

The Many Lives of a Tennessee Judgment Lien (Stephen M. Sumner), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

25-5-103. Personal property.

An execution thereon shall not bind the debtor's legal or equitable interest in stock, choses in action, or other personal property, not liable at law, unless a similar abstract or memorandum is registered within sixty (60) days from rendition of the judgment or decree, in the county where the debtor resides, if the debtor lives in this state, or, if not, then in the county in which the property is located.

Code 1858, § 2985 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 11, § 3); Shan., § 4713; Code 1932, § 8048; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-504; modified.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 12, 14, 16; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 29, 32, 36, 74.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

25-5-104. Bill to subject interest.

In both cases, of realty and personalty, the lien shall cease, unless a bill in equity, to subject such interest, is filed within thirty (30) days from the return of the execution unsatisfied.

Code 1858, § 2986 (deriv. Acts 1832, ch. 11, § 3); Shan., 4714; mod. Code 1932, § 8049; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-505.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 459.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 12, 19, 56; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 30, 36, 37, 40.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

25-5-105. Period of lien's continued validity — No revival of registration.

Once a judgment lien is created by registration as provided in § 25-5-101(b), it will last for the time remaining in a ten-year period from the date of final judgment entry in the court clerk's office.

This section applies to all judgment liens registered on or after May 17, 2000, but in no event shall any judgment lien which had expired on or before May 17, 2000, be deemed to be revived by such registration.

Code 1858, § 2982 (deriv. Acts 1799, ch. 14, § 2; 1831, ch. 90, §§ 7, 8; 1833, ch. 92, § 6); Shan., § 4710; Code 1932, § 8045; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-506; Acts 1986, ch. 673, § 1; 2000, ch. 725, § 1; 2001, ch. 170, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2000, ch. 725, § 2 provided that the act shall apply only to liens executed on or after May 17, 2000.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 7, 37; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 27, 30, 34, 36, 39.

Law Reviews.

The Many Lives of a Tennessee Judgment Lien (Stephen M. Sumner), 20 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 31 (1984).

25-5-106. Appeals — Commencement of time for sale.

If an appeal is taken from any judgment for which the lien provided by this chapter would apply, the time for sale provided in §25-5-105 shall commence upon the final determination of such case.

Code 1858, § 2983 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 90, §§ 7, 8); Acts 1885, ch. 21; Shan., § 4711; mod. Code 1932, § 8046; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-507; Acts 1981, ch. 449, § 2; 1986, ch. 673, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3(d).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 7; 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, §§ 34-36, 39; 21 Tenn. Juris., Recording Acts, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Appeals in Tennessee Equity Cases (R. Lee Bartels), 16 Tenn. L. Rev. 793.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

25-5-107. Rights of third parties — Filing abstract of proceedings.

The title to real estate in counties other than the county in which the judgment or decree is rendered, the bill in equity, judicial attachment, or lis pendens is filed, or from which attachments or executions are issued, shall not be in any manner affected, as to third parties (without actual notice thereof), by any lien, judgment, decree, bill in equity, judicial attachment, or lis pendens, levy of attachment, or levy of execution, till an abstract or memorandum of such proceeding, certified by the clerk or sheriff, as the case may be, shall have been filed for record in the register's office of the county where the land lies.

Such abstract shall be recorded in a book to be kept in such office, to be called the lien book.

Acts 1897, ch. 96, § 1; Shan., § 4714a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8050; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-508.

Cross-References. Eligible for registration, §66-24-101.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

25-5-108. Contents of abstract.

The abstract of the judgment or decree shall show briefly the names of the parties, plaintiff and defendant, the name of the court, and number of the case, and the amount, and date of judgment or decree, and the names of all parties against whom the judgment or decree is taken.

The abstract of the bill in equity, attachment, bill, lis pendens, or judicial attachment, shall show briefly the names of the parties plaintiff and each defendant, name of the court, and number of case, date of filing the bill, or commencement of the suit, date of levy of the attachment, and description of the property upon which it is sought to fix the lien.

The abstract of the attachment or execution shall show briefly the names of the parties to the suit, the name of the court issuing the attachment or execution, the number of the execution or attachment, the date of issue and date of levy and description of the property on which the levy is made, and the names of all parties named as owners or interested in the property levied on.

Acts 1897, ch. 96, § 2; Shan., § 4714a2; Code 1932, § 8051; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-509.

25-5-109. Furnishing of abstract — Fees.

The clerk or sheriff shall furnish such certified abstract upon the demand of any party entitled thereto, and shall receive therefor fifty cents (50¢).

Acts 1897, ch. 96, § 3; Shan., § 4714a3; mod. Code 1932, § 8052; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-510; Acts 1990, ch. 677, § 1.